sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Förvaring och organisation: Kläd- och garderobsförvaring; Bestickaskar; Förvaringssystem för kökslådor; Förvaringspåsar för hemmet; Förvaringskorgar för hemmet; Förvaringsburkar för hemmet; Förvaringslådor för hemmet; Utdragslådor för hemmet; Förvaring av fotografier; Förvaringskrokar och hyllor
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Opbevaring og organisering: Tøj- og klædeskabe; Bestikskuffer; Skuffeindsatser; Opbevaringsposer; Opbevaringskurve; Opbevaringskasser; Opbevaringsbeholdere; Rulleskuffer; Fotoopbevaring; Opbevaringskroge og -stativer
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Organización y almacenamiento: Almacenamiento de ropa y armarios; Estuches de cubiertos; Organizadores para cajones domésticos; Bolsas para almacenaje; Cestos organizadores para el hogar; Cestas para almacenaje; Contenedores para almacenaje; Cajones de almacenaje doméstico; Almacenamiento de fotos; Perchas y estanterías
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Immagazzinamento e organizzazione: Abbigliamento e sistemazione negli armadi; Cassette portaposate; Divisori per cassetti; Borse per la casa; Cestini portaoggetti; Contenitori per oggetti domestici; Contenitori per uso domestico; Cassetti per organizzazione di oggetti domestici; Espositori per fotografie; Ganci e portaabiti
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Rangement et organisation: Rangements pour armoires à vêtements; Coffrets pour ménagère; Organiseurs de tiroir; Sacs de stockage ménager; Paniers de rangement pour la maison; Chariots de rangement; Boîtes de rangement; Tiroirs de rangement; Rangements photo; Crochets et patères
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku: Przechowywanie ubrań; Skrzynki na sztućce; Wkłady do szuflad; Torby domowe; Kosze do przechowywania; Pojemniki do przechowywania z przegródkami; Pojemniki do przechowywania; Systemy szuflad; Przechowywanie zdjęć; Haczyki i stojaki do przechowywania
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Storage & Organization: Clothing & Closet Storage; Flatware Chests; Household Drawer Organizer Inserts; Household Storage Bags; Household Storage Baskets; Household Storage Caddies; Household Storage Containers; Household Storage Drawers; Photo Storage; Storage Hooks & Racks
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Armazenamento e organização: Roupas e armazenamento de roupas; Faqueiros; Organizadores de gavetas; Sacos de armazenamento doméstico; Cestos organizadores domésticos; Cestos para suprimentos domésticos; Recipientes de armazenamento doméstico; Gaveteiro para armazeamento de utensílios domésticos; Armazenamento de fotos; Cabides e prateleiras de armazenamento
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Skladovanie a organizácia: Skladovanie odevov v šatníkoch; Truhlice na príbory; Vložky do zásuvkového organizéra; Úložné boxy; Úložné koše; Úložné košíky; Úložné kontajnery; Úložné zásuvky; Uchovávanie fotografií; Úložné háky a stojany
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Съхранение и организация: Съхранение на дрехи и дрешници; Сандъци за прибори; Органайзери за домакински чекмеджета; Домакински чанти за съхранение; Домакински кошници за съхранение; Домакински органайзери; Домакински контейнери за съхранение; Домакински чекмеджета за съхранение; Съхранение на снимки; Куки и рафтове за съхранение
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 储物/收纳: 服装/衣柜收纳; 餐具盒/箱; 家居抽屉收纳分隔板; 储物袋/收纳袋; 家用收纳篮; 家用收纳用品; 家用收纳箱; 家居储物抽屉; 相片储存; 挂钩和置物架
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Varasto ja säilytys: Vaatesäilytys; Aterinlaatikot; Kodin laatikoiden lokerot; Kodin säilytyspussit; Kodin säilytyskorit; Siivoustarvikekorit; Kodin säilytyslaatikot; Kodin säilytyslaatikostot; Valokuvien säilytys; Säilytyskoukut ja -telineet
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Shranjevanje in organizacija: Shranjevanje oblačil in organizacijo omar; Škatle za jedilni pribor; Vložki za gospodinjske organizatorje predalov; Gospodinjske vrečke za shranjevanje; Gospodinjske košare za shranjevanje; Gospodinjske košarice za shranjevanje; Gospodinjske posode za shranjevanje; Gospodinjski predali za shranjevanje; Shranjevanje fotografij; Kljuke in stojala za shranjevanje
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Armazenamento e organização: Roupa e armazenamento de armário; Arcas para talheres; Divisórias organizadoras para gavetas; Sacos de armazenamento doméstico; Cestos de armazenamento doméstico; Organizadores de armazenamento doméstico; Recipientes para armazenamento doméstico; Gavetas para armazenamento doméstico; Armazenamento de fotografias; Ganchos e prateleiras para armazenamento
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบ: ที่จัดระเบียบเสื้อผ้าและตู้เสื้อผ้า; ตู้ลิ้นชักสำหรับอุปกรณที่ใช้บนโต๊ะอาหาร; ถาดจัดระเบียบลิ้นชักในบ้าน; ถุงจัดเก็บของในบ้าน; ตะกร้าเก็บของใช้ในบ้าน; อุปกรณ์สำหรับจัดเก็บของในบ้าน; ภาชนะจัดเก็บของใช้ในบ้าน; ลิ้นชักจัดเก็บของในบ้าน; ที่เก็บรูปภาพ; ตะขอและชั้นเก็บของ
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés: Ruha- és szekrénytárolás; Evőeszközládák; Háztartási fiókrendező betétek; Háztartási tárolótáskák; Háztartási tárolókosarak; Háztartási tárolókosarak; Háztartási tárolóedények; Háztartási tárolófiókok; Fotótárolás; Tárolóhorgok és -állványok
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Đồ chứa và dụng cụ sắp xếp đồ: Cất giữ đồ đạc và quần áo; Hộp đựng dụng ăn bằng bạc; Phụ kiện ngăn kéo gia dụng; Túi đựng đồ đạc trong nhà; Giỏ Lưu Trữ Gia Dụng; Hộp đựng đồ dùng gia đình; Thùng/ giỏ chứa đồ; Tủ ngăn kéo chứa đồ; Lưu trữ hình ảnh; Móc và giá đựng đồ
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 수납/정리용품: 붙박이장/의류 수납함; 수저류 보관함; 서랍 정리 칸막이; 생활용품 보관 가방; 가정용 수납 바구니; 생활용품 보관함; 가정용 수납함; 가정용 서랍장; 사진 보관; 보관용 걸이/선반
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 儲藏和收納: 服裝收納; 扁平餐具收納盒; 抽屜收納盒/盤; 家居收納袋; 居家收納籃; 居家儲物盒; 家用儲藏容器; 居家收納抽屜; 相片收納用品; 掛勾與收納架
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Хранение вещей: Хранение одежды и обуви; Ящики для столовых приборов; Вставки-органайзеры для ящиков; Сумки для хранения вещей; Корзины для хранения вещей; Коробки для хранения вещей; Контейнеры для хранения вещей; Ящики для хранения вещей; Хранение фотографий; Крючки, полки и стойки для хранения
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Saklama ve Düzenleme: Elbise Dolapları ve Yüklükler; Çatal Bıçak Takımı Sandıkları; Ev Çekmece Düzenleyicileri; Ev Saklama Poşetleri; Ev Tipi Saklama Sepetleri; Ev Saklama Kutuları; Ev Saklama Kapları; Ev Eşyası Saklama Çekmeceleri; Fotoğraf Saklama; Saklama Amaçlı Kanca ve Raflar
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Sandėliavimas ir tvarkymas: Drabužiai ir sandėliavimas spintoje; Stalo įrankių skrynios; Buitiniai stalčių įdėklai; Buitinių daiktų laikymo krepšiai; Buitinių daiktų laikymo krepšiai; Buitinių daiktų laikymo vežimėliai; Buitinių daiktų laikymo konteineriai; Buitinių daiktų laikymo stalčiai; Nuotraukų laikymas; Sandėliavimo kabliukai ir lentynos
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση: Αποθήκευση ρούχων & ντουλαπιών; Κουτιά μαχαιροπήρουνων; Ένθετα οργάνωσης συρταριών οικιακής χρήσης; Τσάντες οικιακής αποθήκευσης; Καλάθια οικιακής αποθήκευσης; Καλάθια οικιακής αποθήκευσης; Δοχεία οικιακής αποθήκευσης; Συρτάρια οικιακής αποθήκευσης; Αποθήκευση φωτογραφιών; Γάντζοι & ράφια αποθήκευσης
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Opruimen en organiseren: Kleding en kledingopslag; Bestekcassettes; Lade-indelingen; Opbergzakken; Opbergmanden; Opbergdozen; Opslagcontainers voor thuis; Opbergladen voor huishoudelijke artikelen; Foto-opslag en -weergave; Opberghaken en -rekken
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Uskladnění a uspořádání: Uskladnění oblečení; Truhly na příbory; Organizéry do zásuvek; Domácí skladovací pytle; Domácí skladovací koše; Dózy na čaj; Domácí skladovací kontejnery; Skříňky se zásuvkami; Ukládání fotografií; Skladovací háčky a regály
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Odlaganje i organizacija: Skladištenje odjeće i ormari; Škrinje za pribor za jelo; Umetci za organizaciju kućanskih ladica; Vreće za pohranu u kućanstvu; Košare za pohranu u kućanstvu; Kolica za pohranu u kućanstvu; Spremnici za pohranu u kućanstvu; Ladice za pohranu u kućanstvu; Pohrana fotografija; Kuke i stalci za pohranu
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Lagring og organisering: Kles- og skaplagring; Bestikkister; Organiseringsinnlegg for husholdningsskuffer; Lagringsposer til hjemmebruk; Lagringskurver til hjemmebruk; Lagringsstasjoner for hjemmebruk; Oppbevaringsbokser for hjemmebruk; Oppbevaringsskuffer for hjemmebruk; Bildeoppbevaring; Lagringskroker og -stativer
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme: Kleider- & Wandschrankaufbewahrung; Tischbesteckkommoden; Schubladeneinsätze; Aufbewahrungsbeutel; Aufbewahrungskörbe; Haushalts-Ordnungshelfer; Aufbewahrungsbehälter; Schubladensysteme; Fotoaufbewahrung; Aufbewahrungshaken & Regale
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 収納: 衣類収納用品; カトラリー収納; 引き出し用仕切りトレー; 日用品収納バッグ; 家庭用収納かご; 日用品収納ケース; 日用品収納コンテナ; 日用品収納引き出し; 写真保管・ディスプレイ用品; 収納用フック・ラック
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Depozitare și organizare: Depozitare haine și depozitare pentru dressing; Cufere pentru veselă; Inserții pentru organizarea sertarelor; Pungi de depozitare de uz casnic; Coșuri de depozitare de uz casnic; Cutii de depozitare de uz casnic; Recipiente de depozitarea de uz casnic; Sertare de depozitare de uz casnic; Depozitarea fotografiilor; Cârlige și suporturi de depozitare